Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB701.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 403 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A postnuptial agreement shall be void and unenforceable unless:
(1) It contains:
(a) The date on which the document was initially received by each party or his
or her independent legal counsel, acknowledged before a notary public by
both parties to the agreement; and
(b) Conspicuous statements of the following:
1. That the drafter of the document does not represent both parties to the
agreement;
2. That each party is advised to retain independent legal counsel;
3. That each party shall be afforded the opportunity to conduct an
independent assessment of financial information and valuation of
assets of the parties; and
4. That in the event of fraud, the agreement may be declared null and
void;
(2) It is executed by the parties to the agreement in the presence of each other before
a notary public and two (2) witnesses;
(3) It includes the signatures of the legal counsel of each party to the agreement if
counsel has been retained; and
(4) Sixty (60) days have elapsed between the date of initial receipt of the document
under subsection (1) of this section and the date of its execution under subsection
(2) of this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/20/2026 10:11 AM Jacketed